Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4065.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Repeal Section 41-3026.21, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 27, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-3034.21, to read: START_STATUTE41-3034.21. Department of economic security; termination July 1, 2034 A. The department of economic security terminates on July 1, 2034. B. Title 41, chapter 14 and this section are repealed on January 1, 2035.END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Purpose Pursuant to section 41-2955, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature continues the department of economic security to provide social services, welfare programs, vocational rehabilitation and employment services and developmental disability programs. Sec. 4. Retroactivity Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply retroactively to from and after July 1, 2026.